Utah statutes.
32A-14a-104 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Governmental immunity.
No provision of this title creates any civil liability on the part of the
state or its agencies and employees, the commission, the department, or any
political  subdivision arising out of their activities in regulating,
controlling, authorizing, or otherwise being involved in the sale or other
distribution of alcoholic beverages.
